Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.040

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1) "Office" means the office of financial management.

(2) "Director" means the director of financial management.

(3) "Agency" means and includes every state agency, office, officer, board, commission, department, state institution, or state institution of higher education, which includes all state universities, regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and community and technical colleges.

[ 1993 c 500 s 4; 1979 c 151 s 110; 1969 ex.s. c 239 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Severability—Effective date—1993 c 500: See notes following RCW 43.41.180.